Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 3. Aerial Hunting or Prospecting

§ 10-2-301.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 207, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived for Laws 1955, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2, provided requirements for aerial hunting and prospecting.

Laws 2005, ch. 207, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.